North Dakota, session 69, SB2356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 47-19-03.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
47-19-03.1. Deeds and contracts for deeds to include name and address of drafter of legal
description.
1. The recorder may not record a deed or contract for deed containing a metes and bounds legal
description which affects the title to or possession of real property that otherwise may be
recorded under this chapter unless the name and address of the individual who drafted the
legal description contained in the deed or contract for deed appears on the instrument in a
legible manner.
2. A deed or contract for deed complies with this section if it contains a statement substantially in
the following form: "The legal description was prepared by ________________ (name)
________________ (address) or obtained from a previously recorded instrument." The
recording of an instrument containing a metes and bounds legal description obtained from a
previously recorded instrument of conveyance under this section may not be rejected based
on section 57 - 02 - 39 .
3. This section does not apply to any instrument executed before January 1, 2000, or any
instrument executed or acknowledged outside the state. The validity and effect of the record of
any instrument in a recorder's office may not be lessened or impaired by the fact the
instrument does not contain the statement required by this section.

S. B. NO. 2356 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2356.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 1 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State